Utah statutes.
78A-6-307.5.   Post-shelter hearing placement of a child who is in division
custody.
(1)  If the court awards custody of a child to the division under Section
78A-6-307, or as otherwise permitted by law, the division shall determine
ongoing placement of the child.
(2)  In placing a child under Subsection (1), the division:
(a)  except as provided in Subsections (2)(b) and (d), shall comply with the
applicable background check provisions described in Section 78A-6-307;
(b)  is not required to receive approval from the court prior to making the
placement;
(c)  shall, within three days, excluding weekends and holidays, after making
the placement, give written notice to the court, and all parties to the
proceedings, that the placement has been made; and
(d)  may place the child with a noncustodial parent or relative of the child,
using the same criteria established for an emergency placement under Section
62A-4a-209, pending the results of:
(i)  the background check described in Subsection 78A-6-307(16)(a); and
(ii)  evaluation with the noncustodial parent or relative to determine the
noncustodial parent's or relative's capacity to provide ongoing care to the
child.
